Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2309
Consultation, defined.

Consultation means a process whereby a nurse practitioner seeks the advice or opinion of a physician or another health care practitioner.

Laws 1996, LB 414, § 23;

Laws 2000, LB 1115, § 32;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 50;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1709.02;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 801.